Washington statutes.
RCW 38.60.050

Certification board—Representation.

The certification board shall represent diverse stakeholders of the 911 system and shall consist of the following volunteer members:

(1) The chair or vice chair of the 911 advisory committee;

(2) Two public safety answering point directors or 911 coordinators, one from the eastside and one from the westside of the Cascade mountains appointed by the 911 advisory committee;

(3) Two labor union representatives from labor unions representing public safety telecommunicators;

(4) One representative appointed by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(5) One representative appointed by the Washington state fire chiefs association;

(6) One representative from the Washington state association of counties appointed by the Washington state association of counties; and

(7) Two public safety telecommunicators from a public safety answering point, one from the eastside and one from the westside of the Cascade mountains appointed by the 911 advisory committee.

[ 2022 c 286 s 5.]